Hawaii statutes.
[§539-1] Definitions. In this chapter,
unless the context otherwise requires:

"Beneficiary form" means a
registration of a security which indicates the present owner of the security
and the intention of the owner regarding the person who will become the owner
of the security upon the death of the owner.

"Devisee" means any person designated
in a will to receive a disposition of real or personal property.

"Heirs" means those persons,
including the surviving spouse, who are entitled under the statutes of
intestate succession to the property of a decedent.

"Person" means an individual, a
corporation, an organization, or other legal entity.

"Personal representative" includes
executor, administrator, successor personal representative, special
administrator, and persons who perform substantially the same function under
the law governing their status.

"Property" includes both real and
personal property or any interest therein and means anything that may be the
subject of ownership.

"Register", including its
derivatives, means to issue a certificate showing the ownership of a
certificated security or, in the case of an uncertificated security, to
initiate or transfer an account showing ownership of securities.

"Registering entity" means a person
who originates or transfers a security title by registration, and includes a
broker maintaining security accounts for customers and a transfer agent or
other person acting for or as an issuer of securities.

"Security" means a share,
participation, or other interest in property, in a business, or in an
obligation of an enterprise or other issuer, and includes a certificated
security, an uncertificated security, and a security account.

"Security account" means:

(1) A reinvestment account associated with a
security, a securities account with a broker, a cash balance in a brokerage
account, cash, interest, earnings, or dividends earned or declared on a
security in an account, a reinvestment account, or a brokerage account, whether
or not credited to the account before the owner's death, or

(2) A cash balance or other property held for or due
to the owner of a security as a replacement for or product of an account
security, whether or not credited to the account before the owner's death.

"State" includes any state of the
United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and
any territory or possession subject to the legislative authority of the United
States. [L 1998, c 63, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next